Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-9306
Travel protection plans; conditions.

Travel protection plans may be offered for one price for the combined features that the travel protection plan offers in this state if:

(1) Such plans clearly disclose to the consumer, at or prior to the time of purchase, that the plans include travel insurance, travel assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers as applicable, and the person provides information and an opportunity, at or prior to the time of purchase, for the consumer to obtain additional information regarding the features and pricing of each; and

(2) The fulfillment materials:

(a) Describe and delineate the travel insurance, travel assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers in the travel protection plans; and

(b) Include the travel insurance disclosures and contact information for persons providing the travel assistance services and cancellation fee waivers, as applicable.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 6.